Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB182.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "state or local government" means any:
(a) Agency, authority, board, bureau, commission, committee, department,
government corporation, institution, instrumentality, legislative body,
political subdivision, or other entity of this state, or of an entity referenced
in paragraph (b) of this subsection; and
(b) City, county, charter county government, urban-county government,
consolidated local government, unified local government, public school
district, public postsecondary institution, special district, or municipal
corporation.
(2) A state or local government shall not utilize the word "free" in the description of
any benefit, product, or service when the word refers to a benefit, product, or
service financed with public funds.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:28 PM Jacketed